Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.655

Drug control assistance unit—Special narcotics enforcement unit.

A special narcotics enforcement unit is established within the Washington state patrol drug control assistance unit. The unit shall be coordinated between the Washington state patrol, the attorney general, and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The initial unit shall consist of attorneys, investigators, and the necessary accountants and support staff. It is the responsibility of the unit to: (1) Conduct criminal narcotic profiteering investigations and assist with prosecutions, (2) train local undercover narcotic agents, and (3) coordinate federal, state, and local interjurisdictional narcotic investigations.

[ 1989 c 271 s 235.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.